Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1101
Labels required.

A stamp or label shall be placed on every ball of binder twine sold, exposed or offered for sale in this state, giving the name of the manufacturer or importer, the number of feet to the pound in such ball, the material from which it is made, the tensile strength, the percent of oil it contains, and the date of manufacture. The deficiency in length shall not exceed five percent of the amount as stated on the label or stamp.

Laws 1967, c. 415, § 1, p. 1281.